District of Columbia statutes.
9-115.02

Expenditure of funds for Klingle Road.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no capital program of federal highway aid projects, federal-aid highway contract, or funds from any source may be expended for Klingle Road, N.W., for any purpose except to facilitate the movement of motor vehicle traffic until a resolution has been transmitted to and approved by the Council authorizing the proposed use. This section shall not preclude critically needed remediation work including, but not limited to, repair to the storm sewer system and protections against further erosion of the roadbed.

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 3503, 49 DCR 6968
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see §§ 3402 and 3403 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).